Hawaii statutes.
§187A-7 Expenditures. (a) The
department may expend all appropriations made for the purpose of effectuating
the objects of title 12.

(b) To further the purposes of title 12, the
department may:

(1) Use lands set apart for the department's use by
the governor; and

(2) Accept gifts and contributions or enter into
contracts. Gifts and contributions may be accepted from, or contracts entered
into with, public or private agencies or individuals. Any gifts and
contributions accepted under this section to benefit sport fish or sport
fishing shall be subject to the requirements specified under section 187A-9.5.

(c) All expenditures by the department shall
be approved and certified by the board. [L 1985, c 94, pt of §1; am L 1993, c
143, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next